Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-640
Admissibility in evidence.

In a proceeding, evidence of a record or signature may not be excluded solely because it is in electronic form.

Laws 2000, LB 929, § 13;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 86-2113;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 402.